Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-547
Animals running at large; regulation.

Cities of the second class and villages shall have power to regulate the running at large of cattle, hogs, horses, mules, sheep, goats, dogs, and other animals and to cause such animals as may be running at large to be impounded and sold to discharge the cost and penalties provided for the violation of such regulations and the expense of impounding and keeping such animals and of such sales.

Laws 1879, § 69, XVI, p. 214;

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XVI, p. 182;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XVI, p. 173;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XVI, p. 301;

R.S.1913, § 5121;

C.S.1922, § 4296;

C.S.1929, § 17-445;

R.S.1943, § 17-547;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 172.

Where a village ordinance provides for impounding of animals running at large and fixes a certain fee which must be paid before the animal will be released, no lien is created for fee or charges permitted not specified in ordinance. Martin v. Foltz, 54 Neb. 162, 74 N.W. 418 (1898).